Maryland, session 2025, SB0987.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
19–101.
In this subtitle, “Commission” means the Maryland Health Care Commission.
PART VI. ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE HEALTH SOFTWARE.
19–150.
(A) THE COMMISSION SHALL MAINTAIN A REGISTRY OF ARTIFICIAL
INTELLIGENCE HEALTH SOFTWARE THAT MAY BE DISTRIBUTED OR OPERATED IN
THE STATE.
(B) A PERSON MAY NOT DISTRIBUTE OR OPERATE ARTIFICIAL
INTELLIGENCE HEALTH SOFTWARE IN THE STATE UNLESS THE SOFTWARE IS
REGISTERED WITH THE COMMISSION.
(C) THE COMMISSION SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS THAT:
(1) DEFINE ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE HEALTH SOFTWARE;
(2) DETERMINE THE INFORMATION ABOUT ARTIFICIAL
INTELLIGENCE HEALTH SOFTWARE TO BE COLLECTED FOR THE REGISTRY; AND
(3) SET A REGISTRATION DEADLINE FOR WHEN THE COMMISSION
WILL BEGIN TO ISSUE FINES TO A PERSON THAT DISTRIBUTES OR OPERATES
UNREGISTERED ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE HEALTH SOFTWARE IN THE STATE.
(D) (1) IF A PERSON DISTRIBUTES OR OPERATES UNREGISTERED
ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE HEALTH SOFTWARE IN THE STATE, THE COMMISSION
MAY FINE THE PERSON UP TO $10,000 FOR EACH DAY THE VIOLATION OCCURRED.
(2) THE AMOUNT OF THE FINE IMPOSED BY THE COMMISSION UNDER
PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION SHALL BE BASED ON:

SENATE BILL 987 3
(I) THE EXTENT OF ACTUAL OR POTENTIAL HARM RELATED TO
THE VIOLATION;
(II) THE COST OF INVESTIGATING THE VIOLATION; AND
(III) WHETHER THE PERSON COMMITTED PREVIOUS
VIOLATIONS OF THIS SECTION.
Article – Insurance
15–147.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN §
3.5–801 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE.
(3) “CARRIER” MEANS:
(I) AN INSURER;
(II) A NONPROFIT HEALTH SERVICE PLAN;
(III) A HEALTH MAINTENANCE ORGANIZATION;
(IV) A DENTAL PLAN ORGANIZATION; OR
(V) ANY OTHER PERSON THAT PROVIDES HEALTH BENEFIT
PLANS SUBJECT TO REGULATION BY THE STATE.
(B) A CARRIER MAY NOT USE ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE TO DECIDE OR
DIRECTLY INFLUENCE A HEALTH CARE DECISION OR A DECISION DIRECTLY
RELATED TO HEALTH CARE.
(C) THIS SECTION MAY NOT BE CONSTRUED TO PROHIBIT A CARRIER FROM
USING ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE TO PERFORM TASKS OR MAKE DECISIONS THAT
ARE NOT RELATED TO HEALTH CARE.
Article – State Finance and Procurement
3.5–801.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.

SENATE BILL 987
(c) “Artificial intelligence” means a machine–based system that:
(1) can, for a given set of human–defined objectives, make predictions,
recommendations, or decisions influencing real or virtual environments;
(2) uses machine and human–based inputs to perceive real and virtual
environments and abstracts those perceptions into models through analysis in an
automated manner; and
(3) uses model inference to formulate options for information or action.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.